Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.220

Credit for military service.

Any person who was a member of the fire department and within the provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, at the time he or she entered, and is an honorably discharged veteran or received a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record from the armed forces, and whose military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005, shall have added and accredited to his or her period of employment as a firefighter as computed under this chapter his or her period of war service in such armed forces upon payment by him or her of his or her contribution for the period of his or her absence, at the rate provided by chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, for other members: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, Such accredited service shall not in any case exceed five years.

[ 2024 c 146 s 18; 2007 c 218 s 38; 1969 ex.s. c 269 s 7; 1947 c 91 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-50.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.